Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 910.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Notwithstanding any other statute or rule of law, with the consent of the defendant and the prosecuting attorney, the court may order as part of the House File 2697, p. 2 dismissal of a public offense or violation of an ordinance that the defendant pay pecuniary damages to the victim, category âBâ restitution, which shall include court costs. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2697, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor